Massachusetts, session 194th, S1002.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7 of Chapter 150 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended by adding after the word
"rental" the following words:-
In zoning districts designated for single family housing and where the minimum lot size
is 10,000 square feet or less, accessory dwelling units by right will be limited to owner occupied
properties and accessory dwelling units can only be occupied by members of the property
owner's extended family. The owner occupancy and family relation requirements may be waived
with a vote of the municipality.
of 1